Utah statutes.
70-3a-201.   Rulemaking authority of division.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may by rule:

(1)  pursuant to Subsection 70-3a-302(1), establish the filing requirements for an application for a registration of a mark;

(2)  pursuant to Subsection 70-3a-303(2), establish what information in addition to the information contained in the application shall be submitted by an applicant for registration under Section 70-3a-302;

(3)  pursuant to Subsection 70-3a-303(3), establish the requirements for an applicant or registrant to disclaim an unregistrable component of a mark that is otherwise registrable;

(4)  pursuant to Section 70-3a-305, establish the filing requirements for an application to renew a registration of a mark; and

(5)  establish the filing requirements for a filing under Section 70-3a-306.

